Maine, session 132, LD56.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1611, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 186, §18, is further
amended to read:
3. Recycled paper bag fees bags and reusable plastic bag fees; exemptions bags.
This subsection governs fees assessed on the use of recycled paper bags and on reusable
bags made of plastic.
A. Beginning January 15, 2021 a A retail establishment may provide a recycled paper
bag or a reusable bag made of plastic to bag products at the point of sale as long as the
retail establishment charges a fee of at least 5¢ per bag.
(1) All amounts collected pursuant to this paragraph are retained by the retail
establishment and may be used for any lawful purpose.
(2) A retail establishment may not rebate or otherwise reimburse a customer any
portion of the fee charged pursuant to this paragraph.
B. The requirement to charge a fee under paragraph A does not apply to:
(1) Stores at which less than 2% of retail sales are attributed to the sale of food
and that have less than 10,000 square feet of retail area;
(2) Restaurants; or
(3) Hunger relief organizations engaged in distributing food directly to consumers
at no charge.
A retail establishment exempt from charging a fee under this paragraph may charge a
fee for a recycled paper bag or a reusable bag made of plastic.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.